Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 1. In General

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 9, effective July 1, 2000, provides: “On and after the effective date of this act, each circuit court shall consist of the county courts geographically located within a judicial district in existence on the effective date of this act. All judicial business pending before any county court shall be considered to be pending before the circuit court, and the circuit court judges shall in all respects be the judicial successors in office of all the county court judges and county courts of the county. All judicial files, records, and dockets belonging to or appertaining to the office of the county court judges and county courts of the counties shall be filed in the appropriate office of the circuit court and safely kept therein, or may be stored and shall in all respects constitute records of the circuit court.”

Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 10, provides: “On and after the effective date of this act, a county court judge holding office on the effective date of this act shall become a circuit court judge of the circuit court in the judicial district in which he was a county court judge and shall perform the duties of a circuit court judge as provided in this act. The term of office of a circuit court judge who holds that office under this section shall expire on the date his term of office as a county court judge would have expired. He shall be considered an incumbent in the office of circuit court judge, and thus, he shall stand for retention in office as circuit court judge.”

§ 5-3-101.
Judicial
districts enumerated; terms of court.

The state of Wyoming is divided into judicial districts as follows:

The county of Laramie is the first judicial district;

The counties of Albany and Carbon are the second judicial district;

and (B) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 54, § 2.

The counties of Sweetwater, Lincoln and Uinta are the third judicial district;

through (C) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 54, § 2.

The counties of Johnson and Sheridan are the fourth judicial district;

and (B) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 54, § 2.

The counties of Big Horn, Hot Springs, Park and Washakie are the fifth judicial district;

through (D) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 54, § 2.

The counties of Campbell, Crook and Weston are the sixth judicial district;

through (C) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 54, § 2.

Natrona county is the seventh judicial district;

The counties of Converse, Platte, Goshen and Niobrara are the eighth judicial district;

through (D) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 54, § 2.

The counties of Fremont, Teton and Sublette are the ninth judicial district.

through (C) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 54, § 2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, there shall be one (1) continuous term of court for the district courts of the state. The continuous term of court shall in no way affect the power of a court to take action in any cause or matter.

History.

Laws 1933, ch. 44, § 1; 1935, ch. 83, § 1; 1937, ch. 16, § 1; 1945, ch. 120, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 1-501; Laws 1953, ch. 41, §§ 1, 2; 1957, ch. 14, §§ 1, 2; W.S. 1957, § 5-41; Laws 1977, ch. 21, § 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2019 ch. 54, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to establishment of circuit courts, see §

5-9-102

.

As to increasing the number of districts and judges by legislature, see art. 5, § 21, Wyo. Const.

As to authority of legislature to fix terms of court, see art. 5, §§ 24 and 26, Wyo. Const.

The 2006 amendment

inserted “on” in (a)(viii)(D).

Laws 2006, Ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 54. § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “as follows” for “as follows with terms as designated”; in (a)(1), deleted the second sentence which read: “Regular terms of the district court shall be held in Laramie county one (1) term beginning on the fourth Monday in March, and one (1) term beginning on the first Monday in October”; in (a)(ii) through (a)(vi) and (a)(viii) and (a)(ix), deleted the second sentence which read: “Regular terms of the district court in each county shall be held”; in (a)(vii), deleted the second sentence which read: “Regular terms of district court shall be held, one (1) term beginning on the first Tuesday in March, and one (1) term beginning on the first Tuesday in September”; and added (b).

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 54 § 2, effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (a)(ii)(A) and (B) which read: “(A) In Albany county, one (1) term beginning on the third Monday in March, and one (1) term beginning on the second Monday in September; and (B) In Carbon county, one (1) term beginning on the third Monday in February, and one (1) term beginning on the second Monday in October.”; repealed former (a)(iii)(A) through (C) which read: “(A) In Sweetwater county, one (1) term beginning on the third Monday in April, and one (1) term beginning on the third Monday in November; (B) In Lincoln county, one (1) term beginning on the first Monday in May, and one (1) term beginning on the first Monday in November; and (C) In Uinta county, one (1) term beginning on the first Monday in April, and one (1) term beginning on the first Monday in October.”; repealed former (a)(iv)(A) and (B) which read: “(A) In Johnson county, one (1) term beginning on the second Monday in April, and one (1) term beginning on the second Monday in October; and (B) In Sheridan county, one (1) term beginning on the first Monday in April, and one (1) term beginning on the first Monday in October.”; repealed former (a)(v)(A) through (D) which read: “(A) In Big Horn county, one (1) term beginning on the second Monday in February, and one (1) term beginning on the second Monday in August; (B) In Hot Springs county, one (1) term beginning on the second Monday in April, and one (1) term beginning on the second Monday in October; (C) In Park county, one (1) term beginning on the second Monday in May, and one (1) term beginning on the second Monday in November; and (D) In Washakie county, one (1) term beginning on the second Monday in March, and one (1) term beginning on the second Monday in September.”; repealed former (a)(vi)(A) through (C) which read: “(A) In Campbell county, one (1) term beginning on the first Monday in February and one (1) term beginning on the second Monday in September; (B) In Crook county, one (1) term beginning on the second Monday in May, and one (1) term beginning on the second Monday in October; and (C) In Weston county, one (1) term beginning on the first Monday in March, and one (1) term beginning on the third Monday in September.”; repealed former (a)(viii)(A) through (D) which read: “(A) In Converse county, one (1) term beginning on the third Monday in April and one (1) term beginning on the third Monday in October; (B) In Platte county, one (1) term beginning on the first Tuesday in February and one (1) term beginning on the second Tuesday in September; (C) In Goshen county, one (1) term beginning on the third Tuesday in November and one (1) term beginning on the first Tuesday in May; and (D) In Niobrara county, one (1) term beginning on the second Monday in February and one (1) term beginning on the first Tuesday in September.”; and repealed former (a)(ix)(A) through (C) which read: “(A) In Fremont county, one (1) term beginning on the second Monday in April, and one (1) term beginning on the fourth Monday in September; (B) In Teton county, one (1) term beginning on the third Monday in May, and one (1) term beginning on the second Monday in October; and (C) In Sublette county, one (1) term beginning on the first Monday in June, and one (1) term beginning on the second Monday in September.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Abolition of districts and judges constitutional. —

A statute abolishing two judicial districts and attaching the counties to other districts, permitting the electors of those counties, before the law becomes effective, to vote for a judge in the intended consolidated district, is not in violation of art. 3, § 27, Wyo. Const., prohibiting certain local and special laws. Brown v. Clark, 47 Wyo. 216, 34 P.2d 17,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1934).

An act reducing the number of judicial districts and judges is not unconstitutional, as art. 5, § 20, Wyo. Const., providing that, “until otherwise provided by law,” the state is divided into three judicial districts, is authority for the legislature to increase or diminish the number of districts, and there are no restrictions except under art. 5, § 21, Wyo. Const., as to the removal of a judge and that the increase in taxable valuation must exceed a certain amount before increases are made. Brown v. Clark, 47 Wyo. 216, 34 P.2d 17,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1934).

Shortening term of judge unconstitutional. —

Where the date fixed by the act for it to become effective would shorten the term of a judge in violation of art. 5, § 21, Wyo. Const., the court may postpone its effective date until the term of the judge has expired. Brown v. Clark, 47 Wyo. 216, 34 P.2d 17,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1934).

Stated

in

Cisneros v. City of Casper, 479 P.2d 198,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 1971).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Wyo. Farm Loan Bd. v. Herschler, 622 P.2d 1378,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1981).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Ousting the Judge: Campaign Politics in the 1984 Wyoming Judicial Retention Elections,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 371 (1989).

§ 5-3-102.
Number of judges; distribution among districts; concurrent jurisdiction; judicial conference to adopt rules.

There shall be two (2) judges of the district court in the second, fourth, fifth and eighth judicial districts, three (3) judges of the district court in the sixth and ninth judicial districts and four (4) judges of the district court in the first, third and seventh judicial districts. In the second judicial district, one (1) judge shall reside in Albany county and one (1) shall reside in Carbon county. In the third judicial district two (2) judges shall reside in Sweetwater county. In the fourth judicial district, one (1) judge shall reside in Sheridan county and one (1) shall reside in Johnson county. In the ninth judicial district one (1) judge shall reside in Fremont county, one (1) judge shall reside in Teton county and one (1) judge shall reside in Sublette county. All district judges in the state shall have concurrent jurisdiction throughout the state and for purposes of assignment, shall have concurrent jurisdiction throughout the state with all circuit court judges.

The district courts shall be free of administrative and fiscal control by the supreme court. There shall be a judicial conference comprised of all district judges which shall meet no less than twice per year. The conference shall coordinate improvement efforts with the judicial administrative conference and shall report to the joint judiciary interim committee of such efforts annually on or before November 1. The conference shall adopt rules governing the organization and procedures of the conference which shall be published in the court rules volume of the Wyoming statutes. The conference shall adopt rules, which shall be binding on all of the district judges, governing the administration of the district courts to include, without limitation, personnel, fiscal and budgetary policy except technology which shall be done to provide an integrated statewide system in accordance with the efforts of the judicial technology task force. The judicial conference shall also adopt suitable rules to provide for division of the work between the judges in multi-judge districts. The judicial conference shall keep minutes of all meetings which, along with all rules adopted by the conference, shall be filed with the supreme court and be made available to the public.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 68, § 8; R.S. 1889, § 201; C.S. 1910, § 2090; C.S. 1920, § 2439; R.S. 1931, § 36-109; C.S. 1945, § 31-109; Laws 1953, ch. 91, § 1; 1957, ch. 100, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 5-42; Laws 1959, ch. 103, § 1; 1969, ch. 207, § 1; 1973, ch. 113, § 1; 1977, ch. 21, § 2; 1980, ch. 20, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 2; 2001, ch. 50, § 1; 2005, ch. 68, § 1; 2008, ch. 120, § 1; 2012, ch. 58, § 1; 2018 ch. 56, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2022 ch. 64, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to election to and filling vacancies in office of district judge, see
art. 5, § 4, Wyo. Const., and
§§

22-2-105

,

22-5-203

,

22-5-205

and

22-18-110

.

As to jurisdiction of district courts, see art. 5, § 10, Wyo. Const.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, or as soon thereafter as suitable facilities become available for the court authorized under this act as certified to the state auditor by the two current judges of the sixth judicial district after consultation with the chairmen of the joint judiciary interim committee, in (a), increased the number of judges for the sixth judicial district from two to three.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, rewrote (a) providing for an additional district court judge in the ninth judicial district and authorizing additional positions.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a), deleted “one (1) judge of the district court in the fourth judicial district” following “There shall be,” inserted “fourth” following “district court in the second,” and inserted the present fourth sentence.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), deleted “first” preceding “third, sixth, seventh” and added “and four (4) judges of the district court in the first judicial district” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in the first sentence of (a), deleted “third,” preceding “sixth,” deleted “seventh” following “sixth,” added “, third and seventh” following “first” and substituted “districts” for “district.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2008, ch. 120, § 3, provides: “No action shall be undertaken to fill, or to begin the process of appointment for, the judicial position authorized under this act until the chief justice of the Wyoming supreme court certifies in person to the joint appropriations interim committee that suitable facilities in Sublette county have been completed and are ready for occupancy for the new judge.
Adequate facilities shall include provision for court room security, a suitable court room to accommodate a twelve (12) person jury, offices and other required auxiliary facilities.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2008, ch. 120, § 2, provides:

“(a)
There is appropriated seven hundred thirty-two thousand five hundred forty-six dollars ($732,546.00) from the general fund to the Wyoming supreme court for the biennium beginning July 1, 2008 and ending June 30, 2010.
This appropriation shall only be expended for salaries, benefits, office equipment, supplies and fees necessary to implement the office of the ninth judicial district court judge in Sublette county authorized by this act.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2010.”

“(b) There are authorized four (4) full-time equivalent positions for the biennium beginning July 1, 2008 and ending June 30, 2010 to implement the purposes of this act.”

Applied

in

Goodman v. State, 644 P.2d 1240,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 339

(Wyo. 1982).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Irvine v. Brooks, 14 Wyo. 393, 84 P. 488,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 19

, 6 L.R.A. (n.s.) 750 (1906); State ex rel. Burdick v. Schnitger, 17 Wyo. 65, 96 P. 238,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1908); State v. Jefferis, 26 Wyo. 115, 178 P. 909,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(1919); Wlodarczyk v. State, 836 P.2d 279,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

§ 5-3-103.
Failure of judge to open court at appointed time; duty of clerk to
declare court open. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 6, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 5-43; repealed by 2019 ch. 54, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 5-3-104.
Opening
day in case of legal holiday. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 47, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 1-503; W.S. 1957, § 5-44; Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 1; repealed by 2019 ch. 54, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 5-3-105.
Simultaneous terms in same district; calling in judge from another
district. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 129, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 1138; R.S. 1931, § 31-203; C.S. 1945, § 1-504; W.S. 1957, § 5-45; repealed by 2019 ch. 54, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

§ 5-3-106.
Judges to hold court for each other.

The judges of the several district courts shall hold courts for each other, when from any cause, any judge of a district court is unable to act or to hear, try or determine any cause in his district; and in such event the judge so disqualified or unable to act shall call upon one (1) of the other judges of the district court to hear, try and determine such cause, and the said judge so called upon, shall try, hear or determine said cause with all the jurisdiction, power and authority possessed by the judge of the district court of the district whereto he is called to act as judge.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 52, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 3300; C.S. 1910, § 912; C.S. 1920, § 1139; R.S. 1931, § 31-204; C.S. 1945, § 1-505; W.S. 1957, § 5-46; 2019 ch. 54, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional authority for district judges holding court for one another, see art. 5, § 11, Wyo. Const.

For authority of judges to act for each other in case of sickness or absence, in the administration of estates, see §

2-2-109

.

As to change of judge or venue, see Rule 21.1, W.R. Cr. P.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted "any cause in his district" for "any cause, or to hold any term or portion of a term of any district court in his district," substituted "such cause, and the said judge" for "such cause, or to hold such term or portion of a term of court, and the said judge," and substituted "said cause with all the jurisdiction" for "said cause, or hold such term or portion of a term, with all the jurisdiction."

Motion to dismiss.

Because it
was unclear whether the State acted in good faith in moving to dismiss,
the district court was directed to conduct such proceedings as were
necessary to determine whether the State acted in bad faith in seeking
dismissal; docket pressure alone did not permit a district judge to
deny the State's motion, especially since disservice to the public
interest had to be found, if at all, in the State's motive, because
district judges historically sat for each other as necessary. State v. Bridger,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 193

(Wyo. June 17, 2014).

Judge from another district is de facto judge. —

Where district judge presided at trial in another district upon an order of the judge of the district wherein cause was pending, he is at least a de facto judge, and where no objection to his authority was made before or during the trial, all objections to such authority are waived. Hoglan v. Geddes, 25 Wyo. 436, 172 P. 136,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1918).

Change of judge after court convened. —

Fact that the judge of the district in which trial took place presided at convening of the court on day the trial began, but that trial was presided over by judge of another district upon request, does not render trial illegal, where it is not shown that there was another court held at the same time. Ross v. State, 8 Wyo. 351, 57 P. 924,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1899).

Premature change of venue. —

That change of venue was granted prematurely could not be jurisdictional, even though erroneous. Holly Sugar Corp. v. Fritzler, 42 Wyo. 446, 296 P. 206,

1931 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1931).

Quoted

in

Wlodarczyk v. State, 836 P.2d 279,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 5-3-107.
Assignment of acting or retired judge to another district in case
of death or other emergency.

If any judge of any district
court in this state shall die, or for any reason become unwilling
or unable to perform the duties of his office, the chief justice of
the supreme court of the state of Wyoming, by order to be duly entered
in the records of the district court of each county in such district,
may assign any district judge or any retired judge of this state,
to perform any and all judicial functions therein, until a successor
for such district shall have been appointed or elected and qualified
according to law, and such assigned judge shall have the same jurisdiction
and authority in such district as a duly elected and qualified judge
of such district.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 202, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 5-47.

Cross references. —

As to retirement of judges of district court and justices of the supreme court, see §

5-1-106

.

§ 5-3-108.
Expenses of judges while acting on supreme bench.

All traveling expenses
incurred by any district judge while traveling to and from the capitol
at Cheyenne, for the purpose of sitting at the supreme court to hear
and determine cases presented before said court, and his expenses
at the capitol, while so engaged, shall be charged to the contingent
fund of the supreme court.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 66, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 31-205; C.S. 1945, § 1-506; W.S. 1957, § 5-48.

Cross references. —

As to calling district judges to act as justices of the supreme court, see art. 5, § 4, Wyo. Const.

As to expenses of state officers generally, see §§

9-3-102

and

9-3-103

.

§ 5-3-109.
Expenses of judges when acting in another district or circuit.

The expenses of any district
judge holding court in any district other than his own or in any circuit
court pursuant to assignment under W.S.

5-9-131

, including his traveling expenses to and from said district
or circuit, and his expenses while holding court therein, shall be
charged to the contingent fund of the court in whose district he is
so holding court or to the contingent fund of the circuit court in
whose circuit he is so holding court pursuant to assignment under W.S.

5-9-131

.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 66, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 31-206; C.S. 1945, § 1-507; W.S. 1957, § 5-49; Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 2.

§ 5-3-110.
Seal of the district court.

Each county shall provide
the clerk of its district court with a seal, the impression of which
shall contain the following words: “The District Court of Wyoming”,
together with the name of the county in which the same is to be used.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 7, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3303; C.S. 1910, § 915; C.S. 1920, § 1141; R.S. 1931, § 31-208; C.S. 1945, § 1-508; W.S. 1957, § 5-50.

Cross references. —

As to duty of clerk as custodian of seal, and requirement that seal be attached to official papers, see §

5-3-210

.

Editor's notes. —

As enacted, the words “Each county shall provide the clerk of its district court with a seal” read: “The board of county commissioners of each county in this state shall within ninety days after the passage of this act, provide a seal for the clerk of the district court of its county.” The revision was made by the 1899 compiler.

§ 5-3-111.
County law library.

The board of county commissioners
shall have the power to establish and maintain in their respective
counties, a county law library, for the use and benefit of the judge
of the district court and other citizens of the state and shall have
the power to appropriate and set aside for the maintenance and support
of said library, such moneys as it shall deem necessary or see fit.
The district court of such county shall superintend and direct all
expenditures made for said library, and shall have full power to make
any rules and regulations, proper and necessary for the preservation,
increase and use of the library, not inconsistent with law.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 84, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1920, § 1569; R.S. 1931, § 29-908; C.S. 1945, § 1-520; W.S. 1957, § 5-51.

§ 5-3-112.
Assignment
to circuit court judge.

A judge of the district court may assign to a circuit court judge any case or proceeding within the jurisdiction of the district court subject only to the following restrictions:

Rules promulgated by the supreme court;

Acceptance of the judge to whom the assignment of the case or proceeding is to be made;

Consent of each plaintiff and each defendant in a civil action wherein the amount in controversy is greater than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00); and

Consent of both the prosecutor and the defendant in a criminal case in which the defendant is charged with any crime for which the aggregate sentences for all crimes charged exceed five (5) years in prison.

The law and rules governing district court and appeals therefrom shall apply to a case or proceeding assigned pursuant to this section.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 1; 2011, ch. 196, § 1; 2012, ch. 98, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (a)(iii), substituted “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00)” for “twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00).”

The 2012 amendment,

in (a)(iii), inserted “greater than,” and deleted “or greater” following “($50,000.00).”

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes
the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary
for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 10, provides: “On and after the effective date of this act [July 1, 2000], a county court judge holding office on the effective date of this act shall become a circuit court judge of the circuit court in the judicial district in which he was a county court judge and shall perform the duties of a circuit court judge as provided in this act. The term of office of a circuit court judge who holds that office under this section shall expire on the date his term of office as a county court judge would have expired. He shall be considered an incumbent in the office of circuit court judge, and thus, he shall stand for retention in office as circuit court judge.”

Cited in

IC v. DW, 2015 WY 135,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Oct. 7,
2015).

§ 5-3-113.
District courts budget submittal.

All district courts shall submit standard and supplemental budget requests to the legislature not later than November 1 of the year preceding the fiscal year in which the standard or supplemental budget is to take effect. The district courts shall prepare all personal services budget requests using the same methods and practices as the executive branch.

History.

2017 ch. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 16, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.